test/src/morphology/A-karjalaine_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - karjalaine: # adjectives 'Karelian / karjalainen' - full paradigm
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Nom: karjalaine
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Gen: karjalazen
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Acc: [karjalaine, karjalazen]
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Par: karjalastu
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Tra: karjalazekse
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Abe: [karjalazetta, karjalazeta, karjalazettah]
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Com: karjalazenke
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ine: karjalazes
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ela: [karjalazespäi, karjalazes]
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ill: karjalazeh
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ade: karjalazel
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Abl: [karjalazelpäi, karjalazel]
     karjalaine+A+Sg+All: karjalazele
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ess: karjalazennu
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ter: karjalazessah
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Apr: karjalazelluo
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Nom: karjalazet
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Gen: karjalazien
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Acc: karjalazet
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Par: karjalazii
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Tra: karjalazikse
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Abe: [karjalazitta, karjalazita, karjalazittah]
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Com: karjalazienke
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ine: karjalazis
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ela: [karjalazispäi, karjalazis]
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ill: karjalazih
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ade: karjalazil
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Abl: [karjalazilpäi, karjalazil]
     karjalaine+A+Pl+All: karjalazile
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ess: karjalazinnu
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ins: karjalazin
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Apr: karjalazielluo
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: karjalainegi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: karjalazengi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [karjalainegi, karjalazengi]
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: karjalastugi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: karjalazeksegi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [karjalazettagi, karjalazetagi, karjalazettahgi]
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: karjalazenkegi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: karjalazesgi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [karjalazespäigi, karjalazesgi]
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: karjalazehgi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: karjalazelgi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [karjalazelpäigi, karjalazelgi]
     karjalaine+A+Sg+All+Clt/gi: karjalazelegi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: karjalazennugi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: karjalazessahgi
     karjalaine+A+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: karjalazelluogi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: karjalazetgi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: karjalaziengi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: karjalazetgi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: karjalaziigi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: karjalaziksegi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [karjalazittagi, karjalazitagi, karjalazittahgi]
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: karjalazienkegi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: karjalazisgi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [karjalazispäigi, karjalazisgi]
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: karjalazihgi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: karjalazilgi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [karjalazilpäigi, karjalazilgi]
     karjalaine+A+Pl+All+Clt/gi: karjalazilegi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: karjalazinnugi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: karjalazingi
     karjalaine+A+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: karjalazielluogi
